Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,139
Storm Water Management Plan Program; created; assistance to cities and counties; grants; Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; duties.

The Storm Water Management Plan Program is created. The purpose of the program is to facilitate and fund the duties of cities and counties under the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2006, regarding storm water runoff under the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System requirements. The Storm Water Management Plan Program shall function as a grant program administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, using funds appropriated for the program. The department shall deduct from funds appropriated amounts sufficient to reimburse itself for its costs of administration of the grant program. Any city or county when applying for a grant under the program shall have a storm water management plan approved by the department which meets the requirements of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System. Grant applications shall be made to the department on forms prescribed by the department. Grant funds shall be distributed by the department as follows:

(1) Not less than eighty percent of the funds available for grants under this section shall be provided to cities and counties in urbanized areas, as identified in 77 Federal Register 18652-18669, that apply for grants and meet the requirements of this section. Grants made pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed proportionately based on the population of applicants within such category, as determined by the most recent federal census update or recount certified by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census. For the purpose of distributing grant funds to a county pursuant to this subdivision, the proportion shall be based on the county population, less the population of city applicants within that county. Any funds available for grants under this subdivision and not awarded by the end of a calendar year shall be available for grants in the following year; and

(2) Not more than twenty percent of the funds available for grants under this section shall be provided to cities and counties outside of urbanized areas, as identified in 77 Federal Register 18652-18669, with populations greater than ten thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal census update or recount certified by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, that apply for grants and meet the requirements of this section. Grants under this subdivision shall be distributed proportionately based on the population of applicants within this category as determined by the most recent federal census update or recount certified by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census. For the purpose of distributing grant funds to a county pursuant to this subdivision, the proportion shall be based on the county population, less the population of city applicants within that county. Any funds available for grants pursuant to this subdivision which have not been awarded at the end of each calendar year shall be available for awarding grants pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section.

Any city or county receiving a grant under subdivision (1) or (2) of this section shall contribute matching funds equal to twenty percent of the grant amount.

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB530, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB683, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 21;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 144.